Utah statutes.
23-21a-5.   Mineral rights retained by landowners -- Oil discovery.

The landowners will retain the mineral rights to said lands and in the event of oil discovery, it shall be obtained by off-shore slant drilling.



Enacted by Chapter 103, 1977 General Session

